Washington statutes.
RCW 11.48.190

Executor of executor may not sue for estate of first testator.

An executor of an executor has no authority as such to commence or maintain an action or proceeding relating to the estate of the testator of the first executor, or to take any charge or control thereof.

[ 1965 c 145 s 11.48.190. Prior: Code 1881 s 723; 1877 p 147 s 727; 1869 p 166 s 664; RRS s 972.]

NOTES:

Administrator with will annexed on death of executor: RCW 11.28.060.